Utah statutes.
58-47b-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.
Grounds for the following actions regarding a license under this chapter are
in accordance with Section 58-1-401:
(1)  refusal to issue a license to an applicant;
(2)  refusal to renew the license of a licensee;
(3)  revocation, suspension, restriction, or placement on probation of a
license;
(4)  issuance of a public or private reprimand to a licensee; and
(5)  issuance of a cease and desist order.
